Illinois, session 104th, SB296.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-3-2 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-2)7    Sec. 3-3-2. Powers and duties. 8    (a) The Parole and Pardon Board is abolished and the term 9"Parole and Pardon Board" as used in any law of Illinois, shall 10read "Prisoner Review Board." After February 1, 1978 (the 11effective date of Public Act 81-1099), the Prisoner Review 12Board shall provide by rule for the orderly transition of all 13files, records, and documents of the Parole and Pardon Board 14and for such other steps as may be necessary to effect an 15orderly transition and shall:16        (1) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 17    at least 3 members decide, cases of prisoners who were 18    sentenced under the law in effect prior to February 1, 19    1978 (the effective date of Public Act 81-1099), and who 20    are eligible for parole;21        (2) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 22    at least 3 members decide, the conditions of parole and 23    the time of discharge from parole, impose sanctions for   SB0296- 2 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1    violations of parole, and revoke parole for those 2    sentenced under the law in effect prior to February 1, 3    1978 (the effective date of Public Act 81-1099); provided 4    that the decision to parole and the conditions of parole 5    for all prisoners who were sentenced for first degree 6    murder or who received a minimum sentence of 20 years or 7    more under the law in effect prior to February 1, 1978 8    shall be determined by a majority vote of the Prisoner 9    Review Board. One representative supporting parole and one 10    representative opposing parole will be allowed to speak. 11    Their comments shall be limited to making corrections and 12    filling in omissions to the Board's presentation and 13    discussion;14        (3) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 15    at least 3 members decide, the conditions of mandatory 16    supervised release and the time of discharge from 17    mandatory supervised release, impose sanctions for 18    violations of mandatory supervised release, and revoke 19    mandatory supervised release for those sentenced under the 20    law in effect after February 1, 1978 (the effective date 21    of Public Act 81-1099);22        (3.5) hear by at least one member and through a panel 23    of at least 3 members decide, the conditions of mandatory 24    supervised release and the time of discharge from 25    mandatory supervised release, to impose sanctions for 26    violations of mandatory supervised release and revoke   SB0296- 3 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1    mandatory supervised release for those serving extended 2    supervised release terms pursuant to paragraph (4) of 3    subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1; 4        (3.6) hear by at least one member and through a panel 5    of at least 3 members decide whether to revoke aftercare 6    release for those committed to the Department of Juvenile 7    Justice under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; 8        (4) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 9    at least 3 members, decide cases brought by the Department 10    of Corrections against a prisoner in the custody of the 11    Department for alleged violation of Department rules with 12    respect to sentence credits under Section 3-6-3 of this 13    Code in which the Department seeks to revoke sentence 14    credits, if the amount of time at issue exceeds 30 days or 15    when, during any 12-month period, the cumulative amount of 16    credit revoked exceeds 30 days except where the infraction 17    is committed or discovered within 60 days of scheduled 18    release. In such cases, the Department of Corrections may 19    revoke up to 30 days of sentence credit. The Board may 20    subsequently approve the revocation of additional sentence 21    credit, if the Department seeks to revoke sentence credit 22    in excess of 30 days. However, the Board shall not be 23    empowered to review the Department's decision with respect 24    to the loss of 30 days of sentence credit for any prisoner 25    or to increase any penalty beyond the length requested by 26    the Department;  SB0296- 4 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1        (5) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 2    at least 3 members decide, the release dates for certain 3    prisoners sentenced under the law in existence prior to 4    February 1, 1978 (the effective date of Public Act 5    81-1099), in accordance with Section 3-3-2.1 of this Code;6        (6) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 7    at least 3 members decide, all requests for pardon, 8    reprieve or commutation, and make confidential 9    recommendations to the Governor;10        (6.5) hear by at least one member who is qualified in 11    the field of juvenile matters and through a panel of at 12    least 3 members, 2 of whom are qualified in the field of 13    juvenile matters, decide parole review cases in accordance 14    with Section 5-4.5-115 of this Code and make release 15    determinations of persons under the age of 21 at the time 16    of the commission of an offense or offenses, other than 17    those persons serving sentences for first degree murder or 18    aggravated criminal sexual assault; 19        (6.6) hear by at least a quorum of the Prisoner Review 20    Board and decide by a majority of members present at the 21    hearing, in accordance with Section 5-4.5-115 of this 22    Code, release determinations of persons under the age of 23    21 at the time of the commission of an offense or offenses 24    of those persons serving sentences for first degree murder 25    or aggravated criminal sexual assault; 26        (7) comply with the requirements of the Open Parole   SB0296- 5 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1    Hearings Act;2        (8) hear by at least one member and, through a panel of 3    at least 3 members, decide cases brought by the Department 4    of Corrections against a prisoner in the custody of the 5    Department for court dismissal of a frivolous lawsuit 6    pursuant to Section 3-6-3(d) of this Code in which the 7    Department seeks to revoke up to 180 days of sentence 8    credit, and if the prisoner has not accumulated 180 days 9    of sentence credit at the time of the dismissal, then all 10    sentence credit accumulated by the prisoner shall be 11    revoked;12        (9) hear by at least 3 members, and, through a panel of 13    at least 3 members, decide whether to grant certificates 14    of relief from disabilities or certificates of good 15    conduct as provided in Article 5.5 of Chapter V;16        (10) upon a petition by a person who has been 17    convicted of a Class 3 or Class 4 felony and who meets the 18    requirements of this paragraph, hear by at least 3 members 19    and, with the unanimous vote of a panel of 3 members, issue 20    a certificate of eligibility for sealing recommending that 21    the court order the sealing of all official records of the 22    arresting authority, the circuit court clerk, and the 23    Illinois State Police concerning the arrest and conviction 24    for the Class 3 or 4 felony. A person may not apply to the 25    Board for a certificate of eligibility for sealing:26            (A) until 5 years have elapsed since the   SB0296- 6 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1        expiration of his or her sentence;2            (B) until 5 years have elapsed since any arrests 3        or detentions by a law enforcement officer for an 4        alleged violation of law, other than a petty offense, 5        traffic offense, conservation offense, or local 6        ordinance offense;7            (C) if convicted of a violation of the Cannabis 8        Control Act, Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the 9        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 10        the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act, or the 11        Methamphetamine Precursor Tracking Act unless the 12        petitioner has completed a drug abuse program for the 13        offense on which sealing is sought and provides proof 14        that he or she has completed the program successfully;15            (D) if convicted of:16                (i) a sex offense described in Article 11 or 17            Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of 18            the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 19            2012;20                (ii) aggravated assault;21                (iii) aggravated battery;22                (iv) domestic battery;23                (v) aggravated domestic battery;24                (vi) violation of an order of protection;25                (vii) an offense under the Criminal Code of 26            1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 involving a   SB0296- 7 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1            firearm; 2                (viii) driving while under the influence of 3            alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating 4            compound or compounds, or any combination thereof;5                (ix) aggravated driving while under the 6            influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 7            intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 8            combination thereof; or9                (x) any crime defined as a crime of violence 10            under Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation 11            Act.12        If a person has applied to the Board for a certificate 13    of eligibility for sealing and the Board denies the 14    certificate, the person must wait at least 4 years before 15    filing again or filing for pardon from the Governor unless 16    the Chairman of the Prisoner Review Board grants a waiver.17        The decision to issue or refrain from issuing a 18    certificate of eligibility for sealing shall be at the 19    Board's sole discretion, and shall not give rise to any 20    cause of action against either the Board or its members.21        The Board may only authorize the sealing of Class 3 22    and 4 felony convictions of the petitioner from one 23    information or indictment under this paragraph (10). A 24    petitioner may only receive one certificate of eligibility 25    for sealing under this provision for life; and26        (11) upon a petition by a person who after having been   SB0296- 8 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1    convicted of a Class 3 or Class 4 felony thereafter served 2    in the United States Armed Forces or National Guard of 3    this or any other state and had received an honorable 4    discharge from the United States Armed Forces or National 5    Guard or who at the time of filing the petition is enlisted 6    in the United States Armed Forces or National Guard of 7    this or any other state and served one tour of duty and who 8    meets the requirements of this paragraph, hear by at least 9    3 members and, with the unanimous vote of a panel of 3 10    members, issue a certificate of eligibility for 11    expungement recommending that the court order the 12    expungement of all official records of the arresting 13    authority, the circuit court clerk, and the Illinois State 14    Police concerning the arrest and conviction for the Class 15    3 or 4 felony. A person may not apply to the Board for a 16    certificate of eligibility for expungement:17            (A) if convicted of:18                (i) a sex offense described in Article 11 or 19            Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of 20            the Criminal Code of 1961 or Criminal Code of 21            2012;22                (ii) an offense under the Criminal Code of 23            1961 or Criminal Code of 2012 involving a firearm; 24            or25                (iii) a crime of violence as defined in 26            Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act;   SB0296- 9 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1            or2            (B) if the person has not served in the United 3        States Armed Forces or National Guard of this or any 4        other state or has not received an honorable discharge 5        from the United States Armed Forces or National Guard 6        of this or any other state or who at the time of the 7        filing of the petition is serving in the United States 8        Armed Forces or National Guard of this or any other 9        state and has not completed one tour of duty.10        If a person has applied to the Board for a certificate 11    of eligibility for expungement and the Board denies the 12    certificate, the person must wait at least 4 years before 13    filing again or filing for a pardon with authorization for 14    expungement from the Governor unless the Governor or 15    Chairman of the Prisoner Review Board grants a waiver. 16    (a-5) The Prisoner Review Board, with the cooperation of 17and in coordination with the Department of Corrections and the 18Department of Central Management Services, shall implement a 19pilot project in 3 correctional institutions providing for the 20conduct of hearings under paragraphs (1) and (4) of subsection 21(a) of this Section through interactive video conferences. The 22project shall be implemented within 6 months after January 1, 231997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-490). Within 6 24months after the implementation of the pilot project, the 25Prisoner Review Board, with the cooperation of and in 26coordination with the Department of Corrections and the   SB0296- 10 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1Department of Central Management Services, shall report to the 2Governor and the General Assembly regarding the use, costs, 3effectiveness, and future viability of interactive video 4conferences for Prisoner Review Board hearings.5    (b) Upon recommendation of the Department the Board may 6restore sentence credit previously revoked.7    (c) The Board shall cooperate with the Department in 8promoting an effective system of parole and mandatory 9supervised release.10    (d) The Board shall promulgate rules for the conduct of 11its work, and the Chairman shall file a copy of such rules and 12any amendments thereto with the Director and with the 13Secretary of State.14    (e) The Board shall keep records of all of its official 15actions and shall make them accessible in accordance with law 16and the rules of the Board.17    (f) The Board or one who has allegedly violated the 18conditions of his or her parole, aftercare release, or 19mandatory supervised release may require by subpoena the 20attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of 21documentary evidence relating to any matter under 22investigation or hearing. The Chairman of the Board may sign 23subpoenas which shall be served by any agent or public 24official authorized by the Chairman of the Board, or by any 25person lawfully authorized to serve a subpoena under the laws 26of the State of Illinois. The attendance of witnesses, and the   SB0296- 11 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1production of documentary evidence, may be required from any 2place in the State to a hearing location in the State before 3the Chairman of the Board or his or her designated agent or 4agents or any duly constituted Committee or Subcommittee of 5the Board. Witnesses so summoned shall be paid the same fees 6and mileage that are paid witnesses in the circuit courts of 7the State, and witnesses whose depositions are taken and the 8persons taking those depositions are each entitled to the same 9fees as are paid for like services in actions in the circuit 10courts of the State. Fees and mileage shall be vouchered for 11payment when the witness is discharged from further 12attendance.13    In case of disobedience to a subpoena, the Board may 14petition any circuit court of the State for an order requiring 15the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of 16documentary evidence or both. A copy of such petition shall be 17served by personal service or by registered or certified mail 18upon the person who has failed to obey the subpoena, and such 19person shall be advised in writing that a hearing upon the 20petition will be requested in a court room to be designated in 21such notice before the judge hearing motions or extraordinary 22remedies at a specified time, on a specified date, not less 23than 10 nor more than 15 days after the deposit of the copy of 24the written notice and petition in the U.S. mail addressed to 25the person at his or her last known address or after the 26personal service of the copy of the notice and petition upon   SB0296- 12 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1such person. The court upon the filing of such a petition, may 2order the person refusing to obey the subpoena to appear at an 3investigation or hearing, or to there produce documentary 4evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence relative to the 5subject matter of that investigation or hearing. Any failure 6to obey such order of the circuit court may be punished by that 7court as a contempt of court.8    Each member of the Board and any hearing officer 9designated by the Board shall have the power to administer 10oaths and to take the testimony of persons under oath.11    (g) Except under subsection (a) of this Section, a 12majority of the members then appointed to the Prisoner Review 13Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all 14business of the Board.15    (h) The Prisoner Review Board shall annually transmit to 16the Director a detailed report of its work for the preceding 17calendar year. The report shall list how many C-Number Cases 18and Good Conduct Requests are considered, granted, and denied 19by the Board, disaggregated by offense, including, but not 20limited to, murder and offenses involving sexual conduct or 21sexual penetration, and indicate if the victims were under 18 22years of age or members of law enforcement. The annual report 23shall also be transmitted to the Governor for submission to 24the Legislature and shall be published on the Board's website 25no later than March 1 of each year.26(Source: P.A. 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21;   SB0296- 13 -LRB104 04085 RLC 14109 b1102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)